District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.03

Consideration.

Except as otherwise provided in its articles of incorporation or bylaws, a membership corporation may admit members for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board of directors. The consideration may take any form, including promissory notes, intangible property, or past or future services. Payment of the consideration may be made at such times and upon such terms as are set forth in or authorized by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720